California, session 20252026, AB1115.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Law enforcement officers are frequently exposed to traumatic events, including violent crimes, accidents, and fatalities, which can lead to mental health issues such as post-traumatic stress disorder, anxiety, depression, and substance abuse.(b) It is well documented that law enforcement officers experience higher rates of mental health challenges than the general population. These challenges can significantly affect their well-being, decisionmaking, and job performance.(c) The mental health of law enforcement officers directly impacts their ability to perform their duties safely and effectively. Officers struggling with mental health issues are more likely to experience burnout, fatigue, and difficulty performing under stress, all of which can negatively affect public safety and law enforcement operations.(d) Mental health challenges in law enforcement not only harm the individual officers but can also compromise the safety of the communities they serve, as untreated mental health conditions may contribute to poor judgment or impaired decisionmaking during critical incidents.(e) Despite the clear need for mental health services, many law enforcement officers face significant barriers to accessing mental health care, including the stigma surrounding mental health issues, concerns about confidentiality, and the lack of specialized programs tailored to the unique needs of first responders.(f) Many officers do not seek help due to fears that doing so may impact their careers or reputation, leading to untreated mental health conditions that can exacerbate problems over time.(g) Law enforcement officers are essential to maintaining public order, responding to emergencies, and ensuring the safety and security of California’s communities. For officers to continue performing these duties effectively, they must be supported with robust mental health resources that address the challenges of their profession.(h) Prioritizing mental health for law enforcement officers is integral to the overall health of California’s communities. Officers with good mental health are better equipped to handle crisis situations and maintain public trust, both of which contribute to better public health outcomes for Californians.SEC. 2. Section 13543 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13543. A local government may designate one or more existing employees specializing in counseling or mental health services as a law enforcement mental health liaison to facilitate mental health support for peace officers who serve the local jurisdiction.